Washington statutes.
RCW 18.20.170

Facilities operated by religious organizations.

Nothing in this chapter or the rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto shall be construed as authorizing the supervision, regulation, or control of the remedial care or treatment of residents in any assisted living facility conducted for those who rely upon treatment by prayer or spiritual means in accordance with the creed or tenets of any well-recognized church or religious denomination.

[ 2012 c 10 s 12; 1957 c 253 s 17.]

NOTES:

Application—2012 c 10: See note following RCW 18.20.010.